Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.140

Refusal to testify—Contempt.

A person who, being present before either house of the legislature, or any committee or joint committee thereof, or commissioner authorized to summon witnesses, wilfully refuses to be sworn or affirmed, or to answer any material and proper question, or to produce, upon reasonable notice, any material and proper books, papers or documents in his or her possession or under his or her control, shall be punished as for contempt, as hereinafter provided.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6011; 1895 c 6 s 12; RRS s 8189.]